Washington statutes.
RCW 35.20.250

Concurrent jurisdiction with superior court and district court.

The municipal court shall have concurrent jurisdiction with the superior court and district court in all civil and criminal matters as now provided by law for district judges, and a judge thereof may sit in preliminary hearings as magistrate. Fines, penalties, and forfeitures before the court under the provisions of this section shall be paid to the county treasurer as provided for district court and commitments shall be to the county jail. Appeals from judgment or order of the court in such cases shall be governed by the law pertaining to appeals from judgments or orders of district judges operating under chapter 3.30 RCW.

[ 1987 c 202 s 198; 1979 ex.s. c 136 s 25; 1969 ex.s. c 147 s 7; 1965 c 7 s 35.20.250. Prior: 1955 c 290 s 25.]

NOTES:

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.

Effective date—Severability—1979 ex.s. c 136: See notes following RCW 46.63.010.